District of Columbia statutes.
21-317

Liability to third persons.

(a)

A claim may be asserted against the custodial property by proceeding against the custodian in the custodial capacity, whether or not the custodian or the minor is personally liable, if a claim is based on the following:

(1)

A contract entered into by a custodian acting in a custodial capacity;

(2)

An obligation arising from the ownership or control of custodial property; or

(3)

A tort committed during the custodianship.

(b)

A custodian is not personally liable in the following circumstances:

(1)

On a contract properly entered into in the custodial capacity unless the custodian fails to reveal that capacity and to identify the custodianship in the contract; or

(2)

For an obligation arising from control of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the custodian is personally at fault.

(c)

A minor is not personally liable for an obligation arising from ownership of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the minor is personally at fault.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(d), 45 DCR 745
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 17 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.
1981 Ed., § 21-317.
This section is referenced in § 21-319.